West Virginia, session 2025, HB2811.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-1007. Sale of barter of child for adoption; prohibition of placement of children for adoption by unlicensed organization; felony offense; penalty. (a) Any person or persons who sells or barters any child for adoption or for any other purpose, is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not more 14 years, or both fined and imprisoned. (b) Any person or organization without a valid and unrevoked license to place children for adoption issued by the Department of Human Services or a unrevoked license to practice law in West Virginia is guilty of a misdemeanor if that person or organization: (1) Advertises in any periodical or newspaper, by radio, or by any other public medium that the person or organization will place children for adoption;(2) Accepts, supplies, provides, or obtains children for adoption; or (3) Causes any advertisement to be published in or by any public medium soliciting, requesting, or asking for any child or children for adoption.(c) Any person, organization, association, or corporation without a valid and unrevoked license to place children for adoption issued by the Department of Human  Services that places any child for adoption is guilty of a misdemeanor. The provisions of this subsection do not apply  to a  birth  parent.(d) Upon conviction of a misdemeanor for violation of this section, if by an individual, the person shall be fined not less $1,000 nor more than $5,000 or confined in jail not more than one year, or both fined and confined.  If the violation is by an organization, association, or corporation, that entity shall be fined not less $5,000 and be subject to revocation of any license or permits received under law.